North Carolina statutes. Chapter 100. Monuments, Memorials and Parks.
Article 5. Flagpoles and Display of Flags in State Parks.

§ 100-17.
Flagpole to be erected in each State park.

At each of the State parks of North Carolina an adequate flagpole shall be erected, in keeping with the construction of other structures thereupon, upon which flags of the United States of America and the State of North Carolina may be flown.

History.

1963, c. 317, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to State salute to the North Carolina flag,

G.S. 144-8

.

§ 100-18.
Display of flags.

Where personnel are available upon the State parks, the flags of the United States and of the State of North Carolina shall be flown on every Saturday and Sunday and on every State holiday from May 1 to October 1 of each year, in conformity with appropriate national and State policy and procedures concerning the display of the State and federal flag.

History.

1963, c. 317, s. 2.

§ 100-19.
Donation of flagpoles.

Flagpoles at State parks may be donated by donors of the lands upon which State parks are situated, and if such donors express a desire to donate flagpoles, such donations shall be accepted in preference to that of any other individual or group. In the event that the donors of the lands upon which the State parks are situated shall not indicate a desire to donate flagpoles therefor within six months of the date of the passage of this Article, donations for flagpoles shall be accepted from individuals or groups who may desire to make such donations and erect the said flagpoles in keeping with the State park regulations.

History.

1963, c. 317, s. 3.